src/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON LÅGENAN	 				
lågenanakta:lågenan#akta AKTA ;        
lågenanakta:lågenan#åvtå ÅVTÅ ;
lågenanguokta:lågenan#guokt GUOKTA ;
lågenangålmmå:lågenan#gålmmå GÅLMMÅ ;  
lågenanniellja:lågenan#niellj GUOKTA ;  
lågenanvihtta+Num:lågenan#vidá GÅLMMÅ-OBL ;             
lågenanguhtta+Num:lågenan#gudá GÅLMMÅ-OBL ;          
lågenangietjav:lågenan#giehtja GIETJAV ; 
